test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-haamit_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - haamit: # 1B v-k, VVC > VC, t-›tt
    haamit+N+Sg+Nom: haamit
    haamit+N+Sg+Gen: haamit
    haamit+N+Sg+Acc: haamit
    haamit+N+Sg+Ill: hamittân
    haamit+N+Sg+Loc: hamittist
    haamit+N+Sg+Com: hamittáin
    haamit+N+Sg+Abe: haamittáá
    haamit+N+Ess: hamittin
    haamit+N+Par: hamittid
    haamit+N+Pl+Nom: hamitteh
    haamit+N+Pl+Gen: hamittij
    haamit+N+Pl+Acc: hamittijd
    haamit+N+Pl+Ill: hamittáid
    haamit+N+Pl+Loc: hamittijn
    haamit+N+Pl+Com: hamittijguin
    haamit+N+Pl+Abe: hamittijttáá
